Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.128.030 and 2012 c 10 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:The following residential facilities shall be exempt from the operation of this chapter:(1) Nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW;(2) Assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;(3) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;(4) Residential treatment centers for individuals with mental illness licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW;(5) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;(6) Homes for individuals with developmental disabilities licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW; and(7) A medical foster home, as defined in 38 C.F.R. 17.73, that is under the oversight and annually reviewed by the United States department of veterans affairs in which care is provided exclusively to three or fewer veterans, and its caregivers are in compliance with applicable state laws including any required training, certification, and background checks.Sec. 2. RCW 74.39A.009 and 2024 c 224 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.(2) "Adult residential care" means services provided by an assisted living facility that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.020 to provide personal care services.(3) "Assisted living facility" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.(4) "Assisted living services" means services provided by an assisted living facility that has a contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 to provide personal care services, intermittent nursing services, and medication administration services; and the facility provides these services to residents who are living in private apartment-like units.(5) "Community residential service business" means a business that:(a) Is certified by the department of social and health services to provide to individuals who have a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020(6):(i) Group home services;(ii) Group training home services;(iii) Supported living services; or(iv) Voluntary placement services provided in a licensed staff residential facility for children;(b) Has a contract with the developmental disabilities administration to provide the services identified in (a) of this subsection; and(c) All of the business's long-term care workers are subject to statutory or regulatory training requirements that are required to provide the services identified in (a) of this subsection.(6) "Consumer" or "client" means a person who is receiving or has applied for services under this chapter, including a person who is receiving services from an individual provider.(7) "Consumer directed employer" is a private entity that contracts with the department to be the legal employer of individual providers. The consumer directed employer is patterned after the agency with choice model, recognized by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services for financial management in consumer directed programs. The entity's responsibilities are described in RCW 74.39A.515 and throughout this chapter and include: (a) Coordination with the consumer, who is the individual provider's managing employer; (b) withholding, filing, and paying income and employment taxes, including workers' compensation premiums and unemployment taxes, for individual providers; (c) verifying an individual provider's qualifications; and (d) providing other administrative and employment-related supports. The consumer directed employer is a social service agency and its employees are mandated reporters as defined in RCW 74.34.020.(8) "Core competencies" means basic training topics, including but not limited to, communication skills, worker self-care, problem solving, maintaining dignity, consumer directed care, cultural sensitivity, body mechanics, fall prevention, skin and body care, long-term care worker roles and boundaries, supporting activities of daily living, and food preparation and handling.(9) "Cost-effective care" means care provided in a setting of an individual's choice that is necessary to promote the most appropriate level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with client choice, in an environment that is appropriate to the care and safety needs of the individual, and such care cannot be provided at a lower cost in any other setting. But this in no way precludes an individual from choosing a different residential setting to achieve his or her desired quality of life.(10) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(11) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.(12) "Direct care worker" means a paid caregiver who provides direct, hands-on personal care services to persons with disabilities or the elderly requiring long-term care.(13) "Enhanced adult residential care" means services provided by an assisted living facility that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 to provide personal care services, intermittent nursing services, and medication administration services.(14) "Facility" means an adult family home, an assisted living facility, a nursing home, an enhanced services facility licensed under chapter 70.97 RCW, or a facility certified to provide medicare or medicaid services in nursing facilities or intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities under 42 C.F.R. Part 483.(15) "Home and community-based services" means services provided in adult family homes, in-home services, and other services administered or provided by contract by the department directly or through contract with area agencies on aging or federally recognized Indian tribes, or similar services provided by facilities and agencies licensed or certified by the department.(16) "Home care aide" means a long-term care worker who is certified as a home care aide by the department of health under chapter 18.88B RCW.(17) "Individual provider" is defined according to RCW 74.39A.240.(18) "Legal employer" means the consumer directed employer, which along with the consumer, coemploys individual providers. The legal employer is responsible for setting wages and benefits for individual providers and must comply with applicable laws including, but not limited to, state minimum wage laws, workers compensation, and unemployment insurance laws.(19) "Long-term care" means care and supports delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over a sustained time to persons of any age who are functionally disabled due to chronic mental or physical illness, disease, chemical dependency, or a medical condition that is permanent, not curable, or is long-lasting and severely limits their mental or physical capacity for self-care. The use of this definition is not intended to expand the scope of services, care, or assistance provided by any individuals, groups, residential care settings, or professions unless otherwise required by law.(20)(a) "Long-term care workers" include all persons who provide paid, hands-on personal care services for the elderly or persons with disabilities, including but not limited to individual providers of home care services, direct care workers employed by home care agencies or a consumer directed employer, providers of home care services to persons with developmental disabilities under Title 71A RCW, all direct care workers in state-licensed assisted living facilities, enhanced services facilities, and adult family homes, respite care providers, direct care workers employed by community residential service businesses, medical foster home caregivers as under 38 C.F.R. 17.73, and any other direct care worker providing home or community-based services to the elderly or persons with functional disabilities or developmental disabilities.(b) "Long-term care workers" do not include: (i) Persons employed by the following facilities or agencies: Nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, hospitals or other acute care settings, residential habilitation centers under chapter 71A.20 RCW, facilities certified under 42 C.F.R., Part 483, hospice agencies subject to chapter 70.127 RCW, adult day care centers, and adult day health care centers; or (ii) persons who are not paid by the state or by a private agency or facility licensed or certified by the state to provide personal care services.(21) "Managing employer" means a consumer who coemploys one or more individual providers and whose responsibilities include (a) choosing potential individual providers and referring them to the consumer directed employer; (b) overseeing the day-to-day management and scheduling of the individual provider's tasks consistent with the plan of care; and (c) dismissing the individual provider when desired.(22) "Nursing home" or "nursing facility" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW or certified as a medicaid nursing facility under 42 C.F.R. Part 483, or both.(23) "Person who is functionally disabled" means a person who because of a recognized chronic physical or mental condition or disease, including chemical dependency or developmental disability, is dependent upon others for direct care, support, supervision, or monitoring to perform activities of daily living. "Activities of daily living," in this context, means self-care abilities related to personal care such as bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer. Instrumental activities of daily living such as cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing personal finances may also be considered when assessing a person's functional ability to perform activities in the home and the community.(24) "Personal care services" means physical or verbal assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living provided because of a person's functional disability.(25) "Population specific competencies" means basic training topics unique to the care needs of the population the long-term care worker is serving, including but not limited to, mental health, dementia, developmental disabilities, young adults with physical disabilities, and older adults.(26) "Qualified instructor" means a registered nurse or other person with specific knowledge, training, and work experience in the provision of direct, hands-on personal care and other assistance services to the elderly or persons with disabilities requiring long-term care.(27) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.(28) "Training partnership" means a joint partnership or trust that includes the office of the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270 with the capacity to provide training, peer mentoring, and workforce development, or other services to individual providers.(29) "Tribally licensed assisted living facility" means an assisted living facility licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe in which a facility provides services similar to services provided by assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.Sec. 3. RCW 74.34.020 and 2023 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health care.(2) "Abuse" means the intentional, willful, or reckless action or inaction that inflicts injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse, and personal exploitation of a vulnerable adult, and improper use of restraint against a vulnerable adult which have the following meanings:(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual conduct, including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, molestation, indecent liberties, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing or recording, voyeurism, indecent exposure, and sexual harassment. Sexual abuse also includes any sexual conduct between a staff person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is consensual.(b) "Physical abuse" means the intentional, willful, or reckless action of inflicting bodily injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching, choking, kicking, shoving, or prodding.(c) "Mental abuse" means an intentional, willful, or reckless verbal or nonverbal action that threatens, humiliates, harasses, coerces, intimidates, isolates, unreasonably confines, or punishes a vulnerable adult. Mental abuse may include ridiculing, yelling, or swearing.(d) "Personal exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of another.(e) "Improper use of restraint" means the inappropriate use of chemical, physical, or mechanical restraints for convenience or discipline or in a manner that: (i) Is inconsistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW; (ii) is not medically authorized; or (iii) otherwise constitutes abuse under this section.(3) "Chemical restraint" means the administration of any drug to manage a vulnerable adult's behavior in a way that reduces the safety risk to the vulnerable adult or others, has the temporary effect of restricting the vulnerable adult's freedom of movement, and is not standard treatment for the vulnerable adult's medical or psychiatric condition.(4) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the receipt of services is voluntary.(5) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(6) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter 18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation centers; ((or)) any other facility licensed or certified by the department; or a medical foster home as defined in 38 C.F.R. 17.73.(7) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use, control over, or withholding of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is not limited to:(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult;(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to, the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult; or(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income, resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks the capacity to consent to the release or use of his or her property, income, resources, or trust funds.(8) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 30A.22.040 and 30A.22.041. For purposes of this chapter only, "financial institution" also means a "broker-dealer" or "investment adviser" as defined in RCW 21.20.005.(9) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW or a state hospital defined in chapter 72.23 RCW and any employee, agent, officer, director, or independent contractor thereof.(10) "Individual provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.39A.240.(11) "Interested person" means a person who demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of the vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests.(12)(a) "Isolate" or "isolation" means to restrict a vulnerable adult's ability to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of his or her choosing. Isolation may be evidenced by acts including but not limited to:(i) Acts that prevent a vulnerable adult from sending, making, or receiving his or her personal mail, electronic communications, or telephone calls; or(ii) Acts that prevent or obstruct the vulnerable adult from meeting with others, such as telling a prospective visitor or caller that a vulnerable adult is not present, or does not wish contact, where the statement is contrary to the express wishes of the vulnerable adult.(b) The term "isolate" or "isolation" may not be construed in a manner that prevents a guardian or limited guardian from performing his or her fiduciary obligations under chapter 11.130 RCW or prevents a hospital or facility from providing treatment consistent with the standard of care for delivery of health services.(13) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department or the department of children, youth, and families; law enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel; individual provider; an operator of a facility or a certified residential services and supports agency under chapter 71A.12 RCW; an employee of a facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health, adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, hospice, or certified residential services and supports agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.(14) "Mechanical restraint" means any device attached or adjacent to the vulnerable adult's body that he or she cannot easily remove that restricts freedom of movement or normal access to his or her body. "Mechanical restraint" does not include the use of devices, materials, or equipment that are (a) medically authorized, as required, and (b) used in a manner that is consistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW.(15) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.(16) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including, but not limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable adults.(17) "Physical restraint" means the application of physical force without the use of any device, for the purpose of restraining the free movement of a vulnerable adult's body. "Physical restraint" does not include (a) briefly holding without undue force a vulnerable adult in order to calm or comfort him or her, or (b) holding a vulnerable adult's hand to safely escort him or her from one area to another.(18) "Protective services" means any services provided by the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral for legal assistance.(19) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual provider.(20) "Social worker" means:(a) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2); or(b) Anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of vulnerable adults, or providing social services to vulnerable adults, whether in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.(21) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself; or(b) Subject to a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265 or adult subject to conservatorship under RCW 11.130.360; or(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or(d) Admitted to any facility; or(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or(f) Receiving services from an individual provider; or(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.(22) "Vulnerable adult advocacy team" means a team of three or more persons who coordinate a multidisciplinary process, in compliance with chapter 266, Laws of 2017 and the protocol governed by RCW 74.34.320, for preventing, identifying, investigating, prosecuting, and providing services related to abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of vulnerable adults.Sec. 4. RCW 74.39A.056 and 2023 c 223 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) All long-term care workers shall be screened through state and federal background checks in a uniform and timely manner to verify that they do not have a history that would disqualify them from working with vulnerable persons. The department must process background checks for long-term care workers and, based on this screening, inform employers, prospective employers, and others as authorized by law, whether screened applicants are ineligible for employment.(b)(i) For long-term care workers hired on or after January 7, 2012, the background checks required under this section shall include checking against the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint identification records system or its successor program. The department shall require these long-term care workers to submit fingerprints for the purpose of investigating conviction records through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation. The department shall not pass on the cost of these criminal background checks to the workers or their employers.(ii) A long-term care worker who is not disqualified by the state background check can work and have unsupervised access pending the results of the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint background check as allowed by rules adopted by the department.(2) A provider may not be employed in the care of and have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults if:(a) The provider is on the vulnerable adult abuse registry or on any other registry based upon a finding of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult;(b) On or after October 1, 1998, the department of children, youth, and families, or its predecessor agency, has made a founded finding of abuse or neglect of a child against the provider. If the provider has received a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW pertaining to the finding, the provider is not disqualified under this section;(c) A disciplining authority, including the department of health, has made a finding of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a minor or a vulnerable adult against the provider; or(d) A court has issued an order that includes a finding of fact or conclusion of law that the provider has committed abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a minor or vulnerable adult. If the provider has received a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW pertaining to the finding of fact or conclusion of law, the provider is not disqualified under this section.(3) The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which contains identifying information about long-term care workers identified under this chapter who have final substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must include disclosure, disposition of findings, notification, findings of fact, appeal rights, and fair hearing requirements. The department shall disclose, upon request, final substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment to any person so requesting this information. This information must also be shared with the department of health to advance the purposes of chapter 18.88B RCW.(4) For the purposes of this section, "provider" means:(a) An individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240;(b) An employee, licensee, or contractor of any of the following: A home care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; a nursing home under chapter 18.51 RCW; an assisted living facility under chapter 18.20 RCW; an enhanced services facility under chapter 70.97 RCW; a certified resident services and supports agency licensed or certified under chapter 71A.12 RCW; an adult family home under chapter 70.128 RCW; or any long-term care facility certified to provide medicaid or medicare services; ((and))(c) Any contractor of the department who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults; and(d) The caregivers of a medical foster home, as under 38 C.F.R. 17.73.(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.--- END ---